Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3427
Health care provider; exercise independent medical judgment.

In following the decision of an attorney in fact, a health care provider shall exercise the same independent medical judgment that the health care provider would exercise in following the decision of the principal if the principal were not incapable.

Laws 1992, LB 696, § 26.